California statutes. Penal Code
(b) A department or agency that employs peace officers shall not authorize or allow its employees to wear a uniform that is made from a camouflage printed or patterned material.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (a), a uniform is “substantially similar” if it so resembles an official uniform of the United States Armed Forces or state active militia as to cause an ordinary reasonable person to
 believe that the person wearing the uniform is a member of the United States Armed Forces or state active militia. A uniform shall not be deemed to be substantially similar to a uniform of the United States Armed Forces or state active militia if it includes at least two of the following three components: a badge or star or facsimile thereof mounted on the chest area, a patch on one or both sleeves displaying the insignia of the employing agency or entity, and the word “Police” or “Sheriff” prominently displayed across the back or chest area of the uniform.

(d) This section applies to personnel who are assigned to uniformed patrol, uniformed crime suppression, or uniformed duty at an event or disturbance, including any personnel that respond to assist at a protest, demonstration, or similar disturbance. It does not apply to members of
 a Special Weapons and Tactics (SWAT) team, sniper team, or tactical team engaged in a tactical response or operation.

(e) This section does not apply to the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 480)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13660.

(a) Any law enforcement agency that authorizes peace officers to carry an electroshock device shall prohibit that device from being holstered or otherwise carried on the same lateral side of the officer’s body as the officer’s primary firearm is holstered or otherwise carried.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electroshock device” means a taser, stun gun, or similar weapon that is designed to temporarily incapacitate a person through the controlled delivery of an
 electric shock, and is designed to be held in a manner similar to a pistol and operated using a finger trigger.

(2) “Law enforcement agency” means any agency or department of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 945, Sec. 1.   (AB 1406)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13663.

(a) Each law enforcement agency shall maintain a policy to require an official report prepared by a law enforcement officer or any member of a law enforcement agency that is generated using artificial intelligence either fully or partially to contain both of the following:

(1) On each page of the official report, or within the body of the text, identify every specific artificial intelligence program used in a manner that makes such identification readily apparent to the reader and prominently state the following:

“This report was written either fully or in part using artificial intelligence.”

(2) The signature of the law enforcement officer or member of a law enforcement agency who prepared the official report, either in physical or electronic form, verifying that they reviewed the contents of that report and that the facts contained in the official report are true and correct.

(b) (1) If a law enforcement officer or any member of a law enforcement agency uses artificial intelligence to create an official report, whether fully or partially, the first draft created shall be retained by the agency for as long as the official report is retained.

(2) Except for the official report, a draft of any report created with the use of artificial intelligence shall not constitute an officer’s
 statement.

(c) The agency utilizing artificial intelligence to generate a first draft or official report shall maintain an audit trail for as long as the official report is retained that, at a minimum, identifies both of the following:

(1) The person who used artificial intelligence to create a report.

(2) The video and audio footage used to create a report, if any.

(d) (1) A contracted vendor shall not share, sell, or otherwise use information provided by a law enforcement agency to be processed by artificial intelligence except for either of the
 following purposes:

(A) The contracted law enforcement agency’s purposes.

(B) Pursuant to a court order. 

(2) A contracted vendor may access data processed
 by artificial intelligence for the purposes of troubleshooting, bias mitigation, accuracy improvement, or system refinement.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments. “Artificial intelligence” as used in this section applies to artificial intelligence systems that automatically draft
 police report narratives based upon an analysis of in-car or dash-mounted cameras, or body-worn camera audio or video, and artificial intelligence systems that analyze a law enforcement officer’s dictated report to generate a police report narrative automatically enhanced by generative artificial intelligence.

(2) “Contracted vendor” means a third party which has made artificial intelligence available to law enforcement for the purpose of generating a draft police report. 

(3) “First draft” means the initial document or narrative produced solely by artificial intelligence.

(4) “Law enforcement agency” means any department or agency of the state or any local government, special district, or other political
 subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer, as described in Section 830.

(5) “Official report” means the final version of the report that is signed by the officer under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (SB 524)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13665.

(a) A police department or sheriff’s office shall not share, on social media, booking photos of an individual arrested on suspicion of committing a nonviolent crime unless any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) A police department or sheriff’s office has determined that the suspect is a fugitive or an imminent threat to an individual or to public safety and releasing or disseminating the suspect’s image will assist in locating or apprehending the suspect or reducing or eliminating the threat.

(2) A judge orders the release or dissemination of the suspect’s image based on a finding that the release or dissemination is in furtherance
 of a legitimate law enforcement interest.

(3) There is an exigent circumstance that necessitates the dissemination of the suspect’s image in furtherance of an urgent and legitimate law enforcement interest.

(b) With respect to an individual who has been arrested for any crime, including crimes defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, a police department or sheriff’s office that shares, on social media, an individual’s booking photo shall do both of the following:

(1) Use the name and pronouns given by the individual. A police department or sheriff’s office may include other legal names or known aliases of an individual if using the names or aliases will assist in locating or apprehending the individual or reducing or eliminating
 an imminent threat to an individual or to public safety or an exigent circumstance exists that necessitates the use of other legal names or known aliases of an individual due to an urgent and legitimate law enforcement interest.

(2) Remove the booking photo from its social media page within 14 days unless any of the circumstances described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) exist.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall apply retroactively to any booking photo shared on social media.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the
 following meanings:

(1) “Nonviolent crime” means a crime not identified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(2) “Social media” has the same meaning as in Section 632.01, except that social media does not include an internet website or an electronic data system developed and administered by the police department or sheriff’s office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   (AB 994)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13667.

(a) Each municipal police department and county sheriff’s department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and the University of California and California State University Police Departments shall, on or before January 1, 2027, develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards to promote safe, consistent, and effective service, implementation, and enforcement of court protection and restraining orders that include firearm access restrictions, including, but not limited to, civil harassment restraining orders, criminal protective orders, domestic violence restraining orders, emergency protective
 orders, juvenile restraining orders, postsecondary school violence restraining orders, workplace violence restraining orders, and elder or dependent adult abuse
 restraining orders other than orders described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (u) of Section 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code related to financial abuse.

(b) The policies and standards developed pursuant to this section shall ensure that the agency consistently complies with the requirements of California laws governing service and enforcement of protection and restraining orders and governing relinquishment of firearms by individuals who are armed and subject to those court orders, including new mandates and responsibilities placed on law enforcement agencies pursuant to Chapter 242 of the Statutes of 2023 and Chapter 544 of the Statutes of 2024.

(c) In developing these policies and standards, the law enforcement agency shall also review and update
 existing protocols, policies, or standards pertaining to protection or restraining orders and law enforcement responses to domestic violence incidents to ensure these relevant protocols, policies, and standards are consistent with one another and current law and to ensure that they provide consistent and accessible guidance to law enforcement officers.

(d) The policies and standards shall provide a standard agency process for law enforcement to serve the order against a restrained person in a timely manner and ensure the agency consistently complies with the requirements of California law
 governing service of protection and restraining orders, including pursuant to Section 6383 of the Family Code and Section 527.12 of the Code of Civil Procedure. These policies and standards shall ensure that officers who have served protection or restraining orders consistently accomplish all of the following steps as soon as possible and within one business day of serving the order:

(1) Completing the appropriate proof of service form developed by the Judicial Council for the protection or restraining order.

(2) Filing the proof of service form with the court.

(3) Ensuring proof of service information is entered into the California Restraining and
 Protective Order System through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System to record that the order has been served on the restrained person.

(e) The policies and standards shall ensure that officers effectuate firearm relinquishment at the time of service by requesting, at the time of service, that the restrained person immediately and safely relinquish to the officer’s control any firearms, ammunition, body armor, and other prohibited items in the restrained person’s possession or control, or subject to the restrained person’s possession or control. The policies and standards
 should ensure officers consistently accomplish the following steps upon serving a protection or restraining order:

(1) Notify the restrained person that they are required to immediately transfer all firearms and prohibited items they possess or control to the officer serving the order.

(2) Request that the restrained party immediately transfer to the officer, safely and unloaded, any firearms or other prohibited items they possess or control.

(3) Conduct a lawful search as necessary for the protection of the officer or other individuals present and take custody of any firearms or other prohibited items in plain sight
 or discovered pursuant to the lawful search.

(4) Complete the appropriate proof of firearm relinquishment form developed by the Judicial Council that serves as the receipt to document relinquished firearms and other prohibited items and issue the receipt form to the restrained person.

(5) Ensure the Automated Firearms System is updated to record any firearms that the restrained person relinquished to the law enforcement officer.

(6) Determine whether the restrained person possesses or controls other firearms that they have not relinquished to the officer. In making such a determination, the officer should be instructed to consider all relevant information, to the extent possible, including by reviewing the protection or
 restraining order to determine if the court made a finding that the restrained person has firearms, querying the Automated Firearms System to determine whether the restrained person is recorded as having legally acquired firearms in that database, and asking the restrained person or, if it is safe to do so, other persons present.

(f) The policies and standards shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Provide a standard agency process for officers to promote firearm relinquishment compliance in circumstances where
 a restrained person owns, possesses, or controls firearms but credibly indicates that they cannot relinquish all firearms at the time of service, including circumstances where those firearms are stored in another location.

(B) The process in subparagraph (A) shall instruct officers to provide accessible local information about how the restrained person can lawfully comply with the court order by relinquishing possession or control of all firearms and other prohibited items, unloaded and in a safe manner, to a local law enforcement agency or to a licensed firearm dealer within 24 hours of being served with the order and by providing the proof of relinquishment compliance receipt form to the court and to the law enforcement agency within 48 hours or being served with the order to verify that the restrained person sold or transferred all
 firearms and other prohibited items that they possess or control.

(2) Instruct officers to inform the restrained person that failure to comply with the requirements and timelines in paragraph (1) may result in fines, arrest, and criminal penalties.

(3) Require officers to encourage restrained individuals to relinquish any firearms they cannot immediately relinquish to the officer through a designated third party or with law enforcement supervision to reduce the risk that the restrained person will access the firearms or other items to threaten or harm individuals protected by the court order or to otherwise harm themselves or others. The policies and standards shall encourage officers to proactively follow up with the restrained person to confirm that the restrained person relinquished
 all firearms and provided receipt forms verifying relinquishment within the required timeline.

(4) Instruct officers about how to respond if the restrained person credibly indicates that they do not possess or control firearms that had been associated
 with the restrained person in the Automated Firearms System, the court order, or other sources, including informing the restrained person to complete and submit to the court a standard form developed by the Department of Justice that declares under penalty of perjury that the restrained person is no longer in possession of one or more firearms, along with their response to the protection or restraining order and any other supporting documentation to verify that the restrained person no longer possesses or controls firearms.

(g) (1) The policies and standards shall provide a process for the agency, in coordination with court staff and other law enforcement agencies and stakeholders, to proactively identify restrained persons who are illegally armed in violation of the court order and state law.

(2) The policies and standards shall instruct officers to take one or more of the following steps, as appropriate for the circumstances, to ensure firearm relinquishment compliance and the safety of any individuals protected by the court order, if the agency receives credible information indicating that the restrained person has not relinquished all firearms or other prohibited items as required:

(A) Contact the restrained person to facilitate and verify immediate firearm relinquishment compliance.

(B) Take custody of firearms or other prohibited items at a location where there is probable cause to believe those items are located, including through a lawful search or by requesting a search warrant to search for and seize these items.

(C) Notify appropriate partners, such as court clerks, prosecutors, and petitioners or protected parties who may be in danger, that the restrained person has violated the protection or restraining order’s firearm relinquishment requirements.

(D) Arrest the restrained person for violating the court order and state law.

(h) The law enforcement agency shall make the standards and policies developed pursuant to this section available to the public upon request and shall post information on the agency’s website about how petitioners may request service of protection or restraining orders by that agency and how prohibited persons and other community members may relinquish firearms to the custody of the agency.

(i) In developing and updating the standards and policies developed pursuant to this section, law enforcement agencies are encouraged to consult and collaborate with domestic violence service providers and survivor advocates, gun violence prevention experts, local court staff, and guidance, technical assistance, or recommendations issued by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   (AB 451)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13670.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Law enforcement agency” means any department or agency of the state or any local government, special district, or other political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer, as described in Section 830.

(2) “Law enforcement gang” means a group of peace officers within a law enforcement agency
 who may identify themselves by a name and may be associated with an identifying symbol, including, but not limited to, matching tattoos, and who engage in a pattern of on-duty behavior that intentionally violates the law or fundamental principles of professional policing, including, but not limited to, excluding, harassing, or discriminating against any individual based on a protected category under federal or state antidiscrimination laws, engaging in or promoting conduct that violates the rights of other employees or members of the public, violating agency policy, the persistent practice of unlawful detention or use of excessive force in circumstances where it is known to be unjustified, falsifying police reports, fabricating or
 destroying evidence, targeting persons for enforcement based solely on protected characteristics of those persons, theft, unauthorized use of alcohol or drugs on duty, unlawful or unauthorized protection of other members from disciplinary actions, and retaliation against other officers who threaten or interfere with the activities of the group.

(b) Each law enforcement agency shall maintain a policy that prohibits participation in a law enforcement gang and that makes violation of that policy grounds for termination. A law enforcement agency shall cooperate in any investigation into these gangs by an inspector general, the Attorney General, or any other authorized agency. Notwithstanding any other law, local agencies may impose greater restrictions on membership and participation in law enforcement gangs, including for discipline and termination purposes.

(c) Except as specifically prohibited by law, a law enforcement agency shall disclose the termination of a peace officer for participation in a law enforcement gang to
 another law enforcement agency conducting a preemployment background investigation of that former peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 408, Sec. 2.   (AB 958)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.9. California Law Enforcement Accountability Reform Act. [13680. - 13683.]

13680.

For purposes of this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Genocide” means any of the following acts committed with specific intent to destroy, in whole or substantially in part, a national, ethnic, racial, or religious group through means including killing or causing serious bodily injury to members of the group, causing permanent impairment of the mental faculties of members of the group through drugs, torture, or similar means, subjecting the group to conditions of life that are intended to cause the physical destruction of the group, in whole or in part, imposing measures intended to prevent births within the group, or forcibly transferring children of the group to another group.

(b) “Hate crime”
 has the same meaning as is Section 422.55.

(c) “Hate group” means an organization that supports, advocates for, threatens, or practices genocide or the commission of hate crimes.

(d) “Membership in a hate group” means being, or holding oneself out as, a member of a hate group with the intent to further the unlawful aims of the group.

(e) “Participation in any hate group activity” means active and direct involvement in, or coordination or facilitation of, any hate crime by hate group members.

(f) “Peace officer” means a person described within Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who is employed by an agency or department of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, that provides uniformed police services to members of
 the public including, without limitation, a municipal police department, a county sheriff’s department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the University of California, California State University, or any California Community College police department, and the police department of any school district, transit district, park district, or port authority. “Peace officer” also includes any state or local correctional or custodial officer, and any parole or probation officer.

(g) (1) “Public expression of hate” means any statement or expression to another person, including any statement or expression made in an online forum that is accessible to another person, that explicitly advocates for, explicitly supports, or explicitly threatens to commit genocide or any hate crime or that explicitly advocates for or explicitly supports any hate group.

(h) “Sustained” means a final determination by the investigating agency following an investigation, or, if adverse action is taken, a final determination by a commission, board, hearing officer, or arbitrator, as applicable, following an opportunity for an administrative appeal pursuant to Sections 3304 and 3304.5 of the Government Code, that the allegation is true.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 164.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13681.

(a) Any background investigation of a candidate for a peace officer position shall include an inquiry into whether the candidate has engaged or is engaging in membership in a hate group, participation in any hate group activity or advocacy of public expressions of hate.

(b) The hiring agency shall deny employment to a candidate for a peace officer position if, during a preemployment background it is determined that in the past 7 years and since 18 years of age, the candidate has engaged in membership in a hate group, participation in any hate group activity, or advocacy of public expressions of hate.

(c) A candidate for a peace officer position shall not be ineligible to be hired pursuant to this section if the candidate has ceased all activities described in subdivision (a) and at least 7 years has passed since the last such activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13682.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 19635 of the Government Code, or any other law, any public agency that employs peace officers shall investigate, or cause to be investigated by the appropriate oversight agency, any internal complaint or complaint from a member of the public that alleges, with sufficient particularity to investigate the matter, that a peace officer employed by that agency has in the previous seven years and since 18 years of age, engaged in membership in a hate group, participation in any hate group activity or advocacy of any public expressions
 of hate.

(b) The agency shall remove from appointment as a peace officer, any peace officer against whom a complaint described in subdivision (a)
 is sustained.

(c) The Department of Justice shall adopt and promulgate guidelines for the investigation and adjudication of complaints
 described in subdivision (a) by a public agency or oversight agency.

(d) Nothing in this section authorizes or requires adverse action to be taken against any peace officer who engages in any activities described in subdivision (a) as part of any undercover assignment in the course of their employment as a peace officer, or in any undercover work as part of any bona fide academic or journalistic research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13683.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 832.7, Sections 7923.600 through 7923.625, inclusive, of the Government Code, or any other law, any record relating to an investigation of a complaint described in Section 13682 in which a sustained finding was made by the public agency or oversight agency that a peace officer has engaged in membership in a hate group, participation in any hate group activity, or advocacy of public expressions of hate shall not be confidential and shall be made available for public inspection.

(b) A record disclosed pursuant to this section may be redacted as follows:

(1) To remove personal data or information, such as a home address, telephone number, email address, or identities of family
 members.

(2) To preserve the anonymity of complainants and witnesses.

(3) To protect confidential medical, financial, or other information of which disclosure is specifically prohibited by federal law or would cause an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy that clearly outweighs the strong public interest in records about misconduct and serious use of force by peace officers and custodial officers.

(4) Where there is a specific, articulable, and particularized reason to believe that disclosure of the record would pose a significant danger to the physical safety of the peace officer or another person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 165.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 5. LAW ENFORCEMENT RESPONSE TO DOMESTIC VIOLENCE [13700. - 13732.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [13700. - 13702.]

13700.

As used in this title:

(a) “Abuse” means intentionally or recklessly causing or attempting to cause bodily injury, or placing another person in reasonable apprehension of imminent serious bodily injury to himself or herself, or another.

(b) “Domestic violence” means abuse committed against an adult or a minor who is a spouse, former spouse, cohabitant, former cohabitant, or person with whom the suspect has had a child or is having or has had a dating or engagement relationship. For purposes of this subdivision, “cohabitant” means two unrelated adult persons living together for a substantial period of time, resulting in some permanency of relationship. Factors that may determine
 whether persons are cohabiting include, but are not limited to, (1) sexual relations between the parties while sharing the same living quarters, (2) sharing of income or expenses, (3) joint use or ownership of property, (4) whether the parties hold themselves out as spouses, (5) the continuity of the relationship, and (6) the length of the relationship.

(c) “Officer” means any officer or employee of a local police department or sheriff’s office, and any peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the University of California Police Department, or the California State University and College Police Departments, as defined in Section 830.2, a peace officer of the Department of General Services of the City of Los Angeles, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 830.31, a housing authority patrol officer, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 830.31, a peace officer as defined in
 subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.32, or a peace officer as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.33.

(d) “Victim” means a person who is a victim of domestic violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 75.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13701.

(a) Every law enforcement agency in this state shall develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards for officers’ responses to domestic violence calls by January 1, 1986. These policies shall reflect that domestic violence is alleged criminal conduct. Further, they shall reflect existing policy that a request for assistance in a situation involving domestic violence is the same as any other request for assistance where violence has occurred.

(b) The written policies shall encourage the arrest of domestic violence offenders if there is probable cause that an offense has been committed. These policies also shall require the arrest of an offender, absent exigent circumstances, if there is probable cause that a protective order issued under Chapter 4
 (commencing with Section 2040) of Part 1 of Division 6, Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200), or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 7700) of Part 3 of Division 12, of the Family Code, or Section 136.2 of this code, or by a court of any other state, a commonwealth, territory, or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, a military tribunal, or a tribe has been violated. These policies shall discourage, when appropriate, but not prohibit, dual arrests. Peace officers shall make reasonable efforts to identify the dominant aggressor in any incident. The dominant aggressor is the person determined to be the most significant, rather than the first, aggressor. In identifying the dominant aggressor, an officer shall consider the intent of the law to protect victims of domestic violence from continuing abuse, the threats creating fear of physical injury, the history of domestic violence between the persons involved, and whether either person acted in self-defense. Notwithstanding
 subdivision (d), law enforcement agencies shall develop these policies with the input of local domestic violence agencies.

(c) These existing local policies and those developed shall be in writing and shall be available to the public upon request and shall include specific standards for the following:

(1) Felony arrests.

(2) Misdemeanor arrests.

(3) Use of citizen arrests.

(4) Verification and enforcement of temporary restraining orders when (A) the suspect is present and (B) the suspect has fled.

(5) Verification and enforcement of stay-away orders.

(6) Cite
 and release policies.

(7) Emergency assistance to victims, such as medical care, transportation to a shelter or to a hospital for treatment when necessary, and police standbys for removing personal property and assistance in safe passage out of the victim’s residence.

(8) Assisting victims in pursuing criminal options, such as giving the victim the report number and directing the victim to the proper investigation unit.

(9) Furnishing written notice to victims at the scene, including, but not limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A statement informing the victim that despite official restraint of the person alleged to have committed domestic violence, the restrained person may be released at any time.

(B) A statement that, “For further information about a shelter you may contact ____.”

(C) A statement that, “For information about other services in the community, where available, you may contact ____.”

(D) A statement that, “For information about the California Victims’ Compensation Program, you may contact 1-800-777-9229.”

(E) A statement informing the victim of domestic violence that the victim may ask the district attorney to file a criminal complaint.

(F) A statement informing the victim of the right to go to the superior court and file a petition requesting any of the following orders for relief:

(i) An order restraining
 the attacker from abusing the victim and other family members.

(ii) An order directing the attacker to leave the household.

(iii) An order preventing the attacker from entering the residence, school, business, or place of employment of the victim.

(iv) An order awarding the victim or the other parent custody of or visitation with a minor child or children.

(v) An order restraining the attacker from molesting or interfering with minor children in the custody of the victim.

(vi) An order directing the party not granted custody to pay support of minor children, if that party has a legal obligation to do so.

(vii) An order
 directing the defendant to make specified debit payments coming due while the order is in effect.

(viii) An order directing that either or both parties participate in counseling.

(G) A statement informing the victim of the right to file a civil suit for losses suffered as a result of the abuse, including medical expenses, loss of earnings, and other expenses for injuries sustained and damage to property, and any other related expenses incurred by the victim or any agency that shelters the victim.

(H) In the case of an alleged violation of subdivision (e) of Section 243 or Section 261, 261.5, 273.5, 286, 287, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, a “Victims of Domestic Violence” card which shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(i) The names and phone numbers of or local county hotlines for, or both the phone numbers of and local county hotlines for, local shelters for victims of domestic violence and rape victim counseling centers within the county, including those centers specified in Section 13837, and their 24-hour counseling service telephone numbers.

(ii) A simple statement on the proper procedures for a victim to follow after a sexual assault.

(iii) A statement that sexual assault by a person who is known to the victim, including sexual assault by a person who is the spouse of the victim, is a crime.

(iv) A statement that domestic violence or assault by a person who is known to the victim, including domestic violence or assault by a person who is the spouse of the victim, is a crime.

(I) A statement informing the victim that strangulation may cause internal injuries and encouraging the victim to seek medical attention.

(10) Writing of reports.

(d) In the development of these policies and standards, each local department is encouraged to consult with domestic violence experts, such as the staff of the local shelter for victims of domestic violence and their children. Departments may use the response guidelines developed by the commission in developing local policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 68.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13702.

Every law enforcement agency in this state shall develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards for dispatchers’ response to domestic violence calls by July 1, 1991. These policies shall reflect that calls reporting threatened, imminent, or ongoing domestic violence, and the violation of any protection order, including orders issued pursuant to Section 136.2, and restraining orders, shall be ranked among the highest priority calls. Dispatchers are not required to verify the validity of the protective order before responding to the request for assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1692, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Restraining Orders [13710. - 13711.]

13710.

(a) (1) Law enforcement agencies shall maintain a complete and systematic record of all protection orders with respect to domestic violence incidents, including orders which have not yet been served, issued pursuant to Section 136.2, restraining orders, and proofs of service in effect. This shall be used to inform law enforcement officers responding to domestic violence calls of the existence, terms, and effective dates of protection orders in effect.

(2) The police department of a community college or school district described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 830.32 shall notify the sheriff or police chief of the city in whose jurisdiction the department is
 located of any protection order served by the department pursuant to this section.

(b) The terms and conditions of the protection order remain enforceable, notwithstanding the acts of the parties, and may be changed only by order of the court.

(c) Upon request, law enforcement agencies shall serve the party to be restrained at the scene of a domestic violence incident or at any time the party is in custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 161, Sec. 2.   (AB 81)   Effective August 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13711.

Whenever a protection order with respect to domestic violence incidents, including orders issued pursuant to Section 136.2 and restraining orders, is applied for or issued, it shall be the responsibility of the clerk of the superior court to distribute a pamphlet to the person who is to be protected by the order that includes the following:

(a) Information as specified in subdivision (i) of Section 13701.

(b) Notice that it is the responsibility of the victim to request notification of an inmate’s release.

(c) Notice that the terms and conditions of the protection order remain enforceable, notwithstanding any acts of the parties, and may be changed only by order of the court.

(d) Notice that the protection order is enforceable in any state, in a commonwealth, territory, or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, or on a reservation, and general information about agencies in other jurisdictions that may be contacted regarding enforcement of a protective order issued by a court of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 661, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Data Collection [13730. - 13732.]

13730.
